Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.157

Decisions to be consistent with growth management act.

The decisions of a boundary review board located in a county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 must be consistent with RCW 36.70A.020, 36.70A.110, and 36.70A.210.

[ 1992 c 162 s 2.]